Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.150

Rules and regulations.

The board shall make all necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter not inconsistent therewith, and may provide the forms of all documents necessary therefor.

[ 1999 c 143 s 26; 1955 c 133 s 16. Prior: 1939 c 142 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 4, part; RRS s 10249-4, part.]